Utah statutes.
53A-6-701.   Scholarships for teachers to obtain endorsements or master's
degrees -- Conditions.
(1)  The State Board of Education may award scholarships to teachers in
necessarily existent small schools or small school districts to pay for
education expenses related to obtaining:
(a)  an endorsement; or
(b)  a master's degree.
(2)  The maximum amount of a scholarship shall be $3,000.
(3) (a)  As a condition of each scholarship, the scholarship recipient upon
obtaining an endorsement or master's degree shall be obligated to teach for
two years in a necessarily existent small school or small school district, as
provided in Subsection (3)(b) or (c).
(b)  A scholarship recipient upon obtaining an endorsement shall be obligated
to teach for two years the subject for which the endorsement was obtained.
(c)  A scholarship recipient upon obtaining a master's degree shall be
obligated to teach for two years the subject for which the master's degree was
obtained.
